Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1385XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1385XD (6) 91
th/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 321E.12, subsection 1, Code 2025, is
amended to read as follows:
1. a. A vehicle traveling under permit shall be registered
for the gross weight of the vehicle and load. A trip permit
issued according to section 326.23 shall not be used in lieu of
the registration provided for in this section.
b. For purposes of this section, a vehicle traveling
under a single-trip permit issued under section 321E.9 may be
registered with the department for the combined gross weight
of the vehicle and load on a single-trip basis. The fee for
single-trip registration is four dollars per ton exceeding
forty tons.